Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1716
Seller-assisted marketing plan; real estate or insurance transactions; excluded.

A seller-assisted marketing plan shall not include any transaction for which either the seller, purchaser, lessor, or lessee is licensed pursuant to and the transaction is governed by the State Real Estate Commission or the Department of Insurance.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 16.